Idaho, session 2026, H0923.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Administration the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $77,600 $10,500 $88,100
Employee Group Insurance
Fund 1,900 1,900
Retained Risk
Fund 0 1,900 1,900
TOTAL $77,600 $14,300 $91,900
II. PUBLIC WORKS:
FROM:
Permanent Building
Fund $43,500 $43,500
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 656,100 $270,900 927,000
TOTAL $699,600 $270,900 $970,500


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
III. PURCHASING:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $146,400 $10,700 $2,400 $159,500
IV. INSURANCE MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Employee Group Insurance
Fund $1,900 $1,900
Retained Risk
Fund 1,900 1,900
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 1,900 1,900
TOTAL $5,700 $5,700
V. DOCUMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,000 $2,000
GRAND TOTAL $226,000 $730,300 $273,300 $1,229,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Administration is hereby reduced
by the following amounts according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027.
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. PUBLIC WORKS:
FROM:
General
Fund $365,000 $365,000


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
II. DOCUMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
AdministrationandAccountingServices
Fund $77,600 $5,000 $82,600
GRAND TOTAL $77,600 $370,000 $447,600
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Administration is hereby increased by one (1.00) for the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.